verbo/espanol_verbo_subj_pret_imp.foma
define SubjPretImpYo1 [a r "("] -> {ase} || _ 1;
define SubjPretImpTu1 [a r "("] -> {ases} || _ 2;
define SubjPretImpElla1 [a r "("] -> {ase} || _ 3;
define SubjPretImpNos1 [a r "("] -> {ásemos} || _ 4;
define SubjPretImpVos1 [a r "("] -> {aseis} || _ 5;
define SubjPretImpUst1 [a r "("] -> {asen} || _ 6;

define SubjPretImpYo11 [a r "(" "("] -> {ara} || _ 1;
define SubjPretImpTu11 [a r "(" "("] -> {aras} || _ 2;
define SubjPretImpElla11 [a r "(" "("] -> {ara} || _ 3;
define SubjPretImpNos11 [a r "(" "("] -> {áramos} || _ 4;
define SubjPretImpVos11 [a r "(" "("] -> {arais} || _ 5;
define SubjPretImpUst11 [a r "(" "("] -> {aran} || _ 6;

define SubjPretImpYo2 [e r "("] -> {iese} || _ 1;
define SubjPretImpTu2 [e r "("] -> {ieses} || _ 2;
define SubjPretImpElla2 [e r "("] -> {iese} || _ 3;
define SubjPretImpNos2 [e r "("] -> {iésemos} || _ 4;
define SubjPretImpVos2 [e r "("] -> {ieseis} || _ 5;
define SubjPretImpUst2 [e r "("] -> {iesen} || _ 6;

define SubjPretImpYo22 [e r "(" "("] -> {iera} || _ 1;
define SubjPretImpTu22 [e r "(" "("] -> {ieras} || _ 2;
define SubjPretImpElla22 [e r "(" "("] -> {iera} || _ 3;
define SubjPretImpNos22 [e r "(" "("] -> {iéramos} || _ 4;
define SubjPretImpVos22 [e r "(" "("] -> {ierais} || _ 5;
define SubjPretImpUst22 [e r "(" "("] -> {ieran} || _ 6;


define SubjPretImpYo3 [i r "("] -> {iera} || _ 1;
define SubjPretImpTu3 [i r "("] -> {ieras} || _ 2;
define SubjPretImpElla3 [i r "("] -> {iera} || _ 3;
define SubjPretImpNos3 [i r "("] -> {iéramos} || _ 4;
define SubjPretImpVos3 [i r "("] -> {ierais} || _ 5;
define SubjPretImpUst3 [i r "("] -> {ieran} || _ 6;

define SubjPretImpYo33 [i r "(" "("] -> {iese} || _ 1;
define SubjPretImpTu33 [i r "(" "("] -> {ieses} || _ 2;
define SubjPretImpElla33 [i r "(" "("] -> {iese} || _ 3;
define SubjPretImpNos33 [i r "(" "("] -> {iésemos} || _ 4;
define SubjPretImpVos33 [i r "(" "("] -> {ieseis} || _ 5;
define SubjPretImpUst33 [i r "(" "("] -> {iesen} || _ 6;


define SubjPretImp1 SubjPretImpYo1 .o. SubjPretImpTu1 .o. SubjPretImpElla1 .o. SubjPretImpNos1 .o. SubjPretImpVos1 .o. SubjPretImpUst1;
define SubjPretImp11 SubjPretImpYo11 .o. SubjPretImpTu11 .o. SubjPretImpElla11 .o. SubjPretImpNos11 .o. SubjPretImpVos11 .o. SubjPretImpUst11;

define SubjPretImp2 SubjPretImpYo2 .o. SubjPretImpTu2 .o. SubjPretImpElla2 .o. SubjPretImpNos2 .o. SubjPretImpVos2 .o. SubjPretImpUst2;
define SubjPretImp22 SubjPretImpYo22 .o. SubjPretImpTu22 .o. SubjPretImpElla22 .o. SubjPretImpNos22 .o. SubjPretImpVos22 .o. SubjPretImpUst22;

define SubjPretImp3 SubjPretImpYo3 .o. SubjPretImpTu3 .o. SubjPretImpElla3 .o. SubjPretImpNos3 .o. SubjPretImpVos3 .o. SubjPretImpUst3;
define SubjPretImp33 SubjPretImpYo33 .o. SubjPretImpTu33 .o. SubjPretImpElla33 .o. SubjPretImpNos33 .o. SubjPretImpVos33 .o. SubjPretImpUst33;

define SubjPretImp SubjPretImp11 .o. SubjPretImp1 .o. SubjPretImp22 .o. SubjPretImp2 .o. SubjPretImp33 .o. SubjPretImp3;
